California statutes. Education Code
(b) “Former migratory child” means a child who was formerly eligible to be counted and served as a currently migratory child within the past five years, but who is no longer a currently migratory child, and who lives in an area served by an ESEA Title I Migrant Education project, and whose parents have been informed of the child’s eligibility for migrant education services but have not removed the child from the program.

(c) “Agricultural activity” means any activity directly related to the production or processing of agricultural products and the cultivation or harvesting of trees.

(d) “Fishing activity” means any activity directly related to the catching or processing of fish or shellfish for initial
 commercial sale or as a principal means of personal subsistence.

(e) “Operating agency” means a local educational agency operating under a subgrant of state migrant education funding, or a public or private nonprofit agency under a special arrangement with the department to carry out a migrant education program.

(f) “Migrant region” means an operating agency comprised of a county office of education or a combination of county offices of education, a combination of school districts within a county, a public or private nonprofit agency not controlled in whole or part by a school district, or a combination of county offices of education and public or private nonprofit agencies, meeting the criteria of subdivision (a) of Section 54444.1.

(g) “Quality control” means the development of program quality standards by the
 state and the conduct of quality review procedures and processes at the operating agency, school district, and school level by state and other professional staff and parents, in conjunction with other interested parties, on a regular basis to assure the maintenance of high quality migrant education programs.

(h) “Supplementary services” means services provided to migratory children which are above the services already provided by a school or school district to other children of that school or school district.

(i) “Average monthly enrollments” means the average monthly number of pupils who are enrolled in a migrant education program. Average monthly enrollments shall be computed by totaling the number of migrant pupils reported by an operating agency during the months of September to June, inclusive, and dividing that total by 10.

(j) “Department” means the State Department of Education.

(k) “Superintendent” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (AB 1255)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

54441.5.

With the concurrence of the child’s parent, a child who has been identified as a “migrant child” may be deemed a migrant child for a period, not in excess of three years, during which the child resides in an area where programs are provided for migrant children. Priority for the provision of services shall be consistent with federal statutes and regulations governing migrant education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 274, Sec. 2.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

54442.

The state board shall adopt a state master plan for services to migrant children. The plan shall include all of the following:

(a) Instructional activities on a regular and extended year basis. These activities shall be designed to identify, assess, and provide treatment for academic deficiencies of migrant children. Special emphasis shall be given to oral and written communications, reading, and mathematics. Small group or individual instruction and tutorial services shall be provided to assist migrant children to attain normal progress rates in all subject areas. All instructional services shall be provided as supplements to regular programs of instruction provided by the public schools for all children.

(b) Health and welfare services. These services shall be designed to identify, assess, and provide treatment for conditions that interfere with the education and learning of migrant children, including dental, emotional, or environmental
 conditions. To the extent possible, existing community resources will be utilized to provide these services.

(c) Preservice and in-service education of professional and nonprofessional personnel. This education shall be planned to prepare school administrators, teachers, aides, and other personnel to meet the special needs of migrant children.

(d) Supportive services including transportation, family liaison, and other services necessary to the success of the programs.

(e) Child development activities including, but not limited to, social, sensorimotor, conceptual and language development, and perceptual discrimination activities for migrant infants and prekindergarten children who are too young to participate
 in instructional services normally provided by the public schools.

(f) The active involvement of parents, teachers, and community representatives in the local implementation of migrant education programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 274, Sec. 3.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

54443.

(a) Migratory children shall be served according to their needs in the following order:

(1) School-aged currently migratory children.

(2) School-aged former migratory children.

(3) Preschool currently migratory children.

(4) Preschool former migratory children.

(b) A project may provide instructional or supporting services to former migratory children only if the participation of these children does not prevent the participation of currently migratory children in the same preschool or school-aged group, and does not dilute the effectiveness of the state migrant education program for currently migratory children.

(c) Eligibility provisions shall be determined in a manner consistent with federal statutes and regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 942, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

54443.1.

Migrant education programs shall include all of the following:

(a) An individual assessment of the educational and relevant health needs of each participating pupil within 30 days of enrollment. This assessment shall include assessments concurrently provided pursuant to compensatory education, bilingual-crosscultural education, school improvement programs, and other programs serving the pupil.

(b) A general needs assessment developed in compliance with federal requirements summarizing the needs of the population to be served.

(c) A comprehensive program to meet the
 educational, health, and related needs of participating pupils which is supplemental to the program the operating agency is otherwise required to provide. The program shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Academic instruction.

(2) Remedial and compensatory instruction.

(3) Bilingual and crosscultural instruction.

(4) Career technical instruction.

(5) Counseling and career education services.

(6) Preschool services in accordance with Section 54443.

(7) Other educational services that are not available in sufficient quantity or quality to
 eligible migratory children.

(8) The acquisition of instructional materials and equipment necessary to adequately provide the appropriate services.

(9) Other related services to meet the special needs of eligible migratory children that are necessary to enable these children to effectively participate in instructional services.

(10) The coordination and teaming of existing resources serving migrant pupils, such as bilingual-crosscultural education, health screening, and compensatory education.

(d) A brief individual learning plan listing the services to be
 provided to each pupil shall be provided in writing or at a parent conference to the parent or guardian of each participating pupil, annually and each time the pupil moves to a new district.

(e) Staffing and staff development plans and practices to meet the needs of pupils and implement the program.

(f) Parent and community involvement as specified in Section 54444.2.

(g) Evaluations that shall include annual pupil progress and overall program effectiveness and quality control reports.

(h) School districts and other education agencies shall be eligible to
 apply for funding to serve migrant pupils upon application to their respective region, or, if they meet the criteria established in subdivision (b) of Section 54444.1, to the department. Operating agencies shall include in their application a description of how the entities will coordinate the planning, budgeting, and operation of the migrant education programs with the planning, budgeting, and operation of other federal and state education programs addressing the needs of the same or similar pupils of the operating agency. The description shall include time lines and cover services provided through school improvement, nonmigrant Title I, state compensatory and limited- and non-English proficient, Title VII, and other funds. If the application meets state and federal requirements, negotiations for an appropriate service agreement shall begin involving the parties listed in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 54444.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 274, Sec. 4.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

54444.

In implementing the plan adopted by the State Board of Education, the Superintendent of Public Instruction is authorized to:

(a) Contract with county superintendents of school or local educational agencies to supply services to migrant children residing within specified geographical regions.

(b) Enter into agreements or otherwise cooperate with other states or agencies of the state or the federal government in providing or coordinating services to migrant children including the Mini-Corps Program as well as participation in or utilization of the Migrant Student Record Transfer System, or other equivalent information systems as may be used by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 942, Sec. 6.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

54444.1.

(a) In implementing the state master plan for services to migrant children, the Superintendent shall establish the service regional system as the primary method for the delivery of services to migrant children. The Superintendent shall review and approve plans for the establishment of service regions and shall incorporate the following criteria in the approval of regional plans:

(1) The boundaries of regions shall include all geographic areas with migrant and seasonal agricultural workers and fishermen.

(2) Regional service centers shall be located in areas with high concentrations of migrant and seasonal agricultural
 workers and fishermen. Regional headquarters shall be located as follows:

(A) In areas requiring large numbers of these workers for a period of at least two consecutive months during each year.

(B) In areas that normally contract for migrant and seasonal agricultural workers with families rather than single adults.

(C) In areas where migrant and seasonal agricultural workers are involved in the transition from hand labor to mechanization.

(3) Regions shall be located in each geographic area of the state, except areas within the boundaries of directly funded
 districts.

(4) Except areas within the boundaries of directly funded districts, regions shall be contiguous to one another and should have no less than 1,500 migratory children. In no event shall a county be split among two separate regions in order to meet the requirements of this paragraph.

(5) Regions shall be organized so as to provide quality services to all affected parties and maintain fiscal procedures in conformity with requirements adopted by the department.

(6) The boundaries of regions shall be drawn in a manner that avoids excessive commuting by personnel or by participants in the programs, not to exceed 100 miles from the schoolsite to the operating agency.

(7) If a proposed region cannot meet the criteria established in paragraph (4) or
 (6), it may request that the criteria be waived by the state board. The waiver request shall be based upon a study, conducted by the entities, including their respective parent advisory councils, comprising the proposed region, that explains why the waiver is required and that describes likely outcomes if the waiver is not granted.

(b) An agency meeting the criteria set forth in this subdivision and subdivision (f) of Section 54441 may apply to the department for designation as a region. The application shall be in a format with sufficient information and at times designated by the Superintendent. The application shall include documentation of active participation, review and comment by the appropriate parent advisory councils, and signatures by parent advisory council chairpersons that the review and comment has taken place, and shall further include documentation that the agencies and parent representative comprising the proposed region have
 met as a group prior to submission of the application and have agreed upon the formation of, and participation in, the region and a general delineation of the services which will be provided in the region.

Directly funded districts shall be invited by the regions to participate in regional activities and meetings. Staff and parent advisory council members in the districts shall also be invited to regional inservice activities and conferences.

(c) The department may directly fund local educational agencies, in whole or in part, to provide services to eligible migrant children if it is cost effective to do so; if the applicant agency serves not less than 1,500, nor more than 8,000, currently migratory children; has sufficient programmatic and fiscal resources to deliver an effective migrant education program; is in compliance with the federal and state requirements regarding migrant education programs;
 maintains an ongoing and functional parent advisory council that has voted on a biennial basis to approve the participation in the directly funded program, including the approval of a majority of the members who are the parents of migrant children; and maintains fiscal procedures in conformity with the requirements adopted by the department. All districts that are directly funded on January 1, 1982, may continue to be funded directly, provided that the districts comply with the criteria prescribed by this subdivision, except for the size criterion.

(d) The
 responsibilities of the various parties involved in the delivery of services to migrant children shall be set forth in a service agreement. A service agreement shall be a legally binding contract signed by the duly constituted authorities at the state, county, district, or private or public nonprofit agencies, or a combination thereof. In the regional delivery system, there shall be two parties to every service agreement; the region and the district or other operating agencies in which the eligible migrant pupils are enrolled. When a district or agency is funded directly by the state, the parties to the service agreement shall include the department and the district or operating agency in which the eligible migrant pupils are enrolled. The basic responsibilities of these three parties shall be as specified in Section 54444.4.

The parties, whether regional or directly funded, shall take the necessary steps to ensure the effective involvement of the migrant parent
 advisory committee for that district or agency. Representatives of the migrant parent advisory committee shall have the right to be present and participate in all deliberations between the parties regarding the service agreement or any subsequent changes thereto. The service agreement shall include a signed statement from the officers of the migrant parent advisory committee signifying that the participation has occurred.

(e) The Superintendent shall develop an annual operating calendar for regions and directly funded districts, including dates for the submission and approval of applications and service agreements. Any changes in regional boundaries for the subsequent fiscal year shall be made and approved by December 31 of the current year. Any changes in funding allocations for regions shall be made by December 31 of the current year or immediately after notification of a federal grant award.

(f) The Superintendent shall preserve the supplemental nature of the migrant education program. The program shall be maintained outside the supervision or above the administrative level of the consolidated application programs. The Superintendent shall not incorporate the migrant education program into the consolidated application process, except as provided below:

(1) Directly funded districts may apply for migrant education funds as part of their consolidated application provided the district parent advisory council on migrant education approves the inclusion.

(2) A copy of the district’s annual application for migrant education funds as required by
 subdivision (h) of Section 54443.1 shall be attached to the district’s annual consolidated application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 274, Sec. 5.   (SB 331)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

54444.2.

(a) The Superintendent shall take the steps necessary to ensure effective parental involvement throughout the state migrant education program, which shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The Superintendent shall adopt rules and regulations requiring each operating agency receiving migrant education funds or services to actively solicit parental involvement in the planning, operation, and evaluation of its programs through the establishment of, and consultation with, a parent advisory council.

(A) The membership of each parent advisory council shall be composed of members who are knowledgeable
 of the needs of migrant children, and shall be elected by the parents of migrant children enrolled in the operating agency’s programs. The composition of the council shall be determined by the parents at a general meeting to which all parents of pupils enrolled in the migrant program shall be invited. Parents shall be informed, in a language they understand, that the parents have the sole authority to decide on the composition of the council. All parent candidates for the council shall be nominated by parents; nonparent candidates shall be nominated by the groups they represent: teachers by teachers, administrators by administrators, other school personnel by other school personnel, and pupils by pupils. All other community candidates shall be nominated by the parents. Each parent advisory council shall hold meetings on a regular basis during the operation of the regular program, but not less than
 six times during the year.

(B) At least two-thirds of the members of each parent advisory council shall be the parents of migrant children. Each parent advisory council shall have the responsibilities listed in subdivision (a) of Section 54444.4.

(2) The Superintendent shall establish a statewide parent advisory council that shall participate in the planning, operation, and evaluation of the state migrant education program. The membership of the statewide parent advisory council shall be composed of members who are knowledgeable of the needs of migrant children, and shall be nominated and elected by the parents of migrant children enrolled in the operating agencies. At least two-thirds of the members of the State Parent Advisory Council shall be the parents of migrant
 children. The state council shall meet a minimum of six times a calendar year to provide input on issues relating to the operation of the program. Special meetings may be called at the discretion of the state director.

(3) (A) (i) The Superintendent also shall sponsor a biennial State Parent Advisory Council Conference. The conference shall be scheduled during the spring.

(ii) The Superintendent may sponsor regional conferences to take the place of the State Parent Advisory Council Conference if the Superintendent determines that regional conferences will increase parent participation.

(B) Every three years, the State Parent Advisory Council shall prepare and submit a report to
 the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, the state board, the Superintendent, and the Governor regarding the status of the migrant education program. The report shall be submitted within 120 days from the conclusion of a training program on preparing the report provided by the Superintendent in accordance with paragraph (5).

(C) The report shall include an evaluation of the migrant education program, as required pursuant to paragraph (2), a review of annual needs and a yearend assessment, as required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 54444.4, and policy recommendations.

(4) The Superintendent and each operating agency shall furnish, without charge, to the statewide and operating agency parent advisory councils and, upon request, to
 each member, a copy of all applicable state and federal migrant education statutes, rules and regulations, and guidelines. In addition, the Superintendent and each operating agency shall furnish, without charge, to the statewide and operating agency parent advisory councils and, upon request, to each member, copies of all applicable state and federal audits, monitoring reports, and evaluations.

(5) The Superintendent and each operating agency shall establish and implement training programs for members of the statewide and operating agency parent advisory councils to enable them to carry out their responsibilities. Each training program shall be developed in consultation with the parent advisory councils, and shall include appropriate training materials in a language understandable to each member. Costs incurred in providing training
 under this paragraph, including federally authorized expenses associated with the attendance of members at training sessions, shall be funded, to the extent that funds are available, by federal funds allocated to the state, based upon the educational and related health needs of migratory children defined in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 54441, and may be supported by funds from the state migrant education program.

(b) Each operating agency that provides services on a statewide basis shall be exempt from the requirement that it create its own parent advisory council, but shall consult the statewide parent advisory council in the planning, operation, and evaluation of its programs.

(c) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or any other law, all
 requirements for 2020 nominations and elections for parent advisory councils shall be suspended until September 1, 2020.

(d) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), parent advisory councils shall meet at least three times in the 2020 calendar year.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the State Parent Advisory Council shall meet at least three times in the 2020 calendar year.

(f) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the Superintendent shall not be required to sponsor a biennial State Parent Advisory Council Conference in the 2020 calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 60.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

54444.3.

(a) Each operating agency receiving federal Title I Migrant Education funding shall conduct summer school programs for eligible migrant children in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. The summer school programs shall respond to the individual needs of participating pupils, and shall build on and be consistent with the instructional programs offered to these pupils during the regular school year. Each summer school program shall be funded, to the extent that funds are available, by federal funds earmarked for migrant education programs, and shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) (A) That summer school programs
 meet the following time requirements:

(i) For kindergarten classes, not less than 180 minutes per day, based upon the full apportionment day of 240 minutes, including recesses, for not less than 20 teaching days.

(ii) For grades 1 to 8, inclusive, not less than 200 minutes per day, based upon the full apportionment day of 240 minutes, including recesses and passing time but excluding noon intermissions, for not less than 20 teaching days.

(iii) For grades 7 to 12, inclusive, not less than 240 minutes per day, including passing time but excluding noon intermissions, for not less than 30 teaching days.

(B) Exemptions from the requirements of this paragraph may be
 made by the Superintendent upon petition submitted to the Superintendent by the school district. The basis for the exemption shall be agricultural labor factors, climatic conditions, specialized educational programs, and other conditions appearing to the Superintendent to warrant exemption.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, holidays designated in Section 37220 other than Saturday and Sunday may be deducted from the required number of teaching days.

(2) That the program has been established with the prior written approval of the Superintendent based upon the submission of an application that is in the form prescribed and furnished by the Superintendent. Each application shall designate the persons who will exercise administrative or supervisorial responsibilities for
 the summer school program, and shall be submitted before the establishment of the summer school program.

(3) That the summer school program contains coursework
 that is of the same level of difficulty in each subject as that provided to pupils enrolled in regular classes of instruction within the school district in the preceding year.

(4) That instructional programs are taught by staff with cultural training or background and understanding of the special needs of migrant children, and who are properly credentialed for the subjects and grade levels to which they are assigned.

(5) That the summer school program supplements other summer school programs, whether required or optional and whether federally or state funded, operated by the school district, including the programs for graduating high school seniors, handicapped children, pupils enrolled in grade 11, pupils enrolled in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, who do not meet
 the school district’s adopted proficiency standards, and eligible compensatory education pupils.

(b) (1) Each school district, county office of education, and community college district shall, upon request, make facilities available at cost for the operation of migrant summer school programs whenever they are available. Where available, these facilities shall be suitable for the summer climate. The
 Superintendent may allow neighboring districts to jointly offer facilities if the Superintendent determines that the use of one district’s facilities for an area will adequately meet the needs of the migrant summer school program for the entire area.

(2) If the Superintendent determines that requests from prospective users of these facilities were denied without just cause, the Superintendent shall reduce the school district’s or county superintendent’s entitlement from Section A of the State School Fund by an amount equal to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or four times the costs to the prospective user for alternative facilities for the entire period for which the facilities were requested, whichever is greater.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), school
 districts, county offices of education, and community college districts that have closed their facilities due to the COVID-19 pandemic are not required to make facilities available for migrant summer school programs in the 2020 calendar year.

(d) Summer school programs required by this section may be offered through distance learning for the 2020 calendar year.

(e) The time requirements in subdivision (a) are waived for the 2020 calendar year. However, local educational agencies are encouraged to offer the minimum instructional minute requirements to the extent practicable for the 2020 calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 61.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

54444.4.

(a) The responsibilities of parent advisory councils at the district, regional, and state levels shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The establishment of migrant education program goals, objectives, and priorities.

(2) The review of annual needs and year-end assessment, as well as program activities, for each school, and a review of individualized educational plans.

(3) Advice on the selection, development, and reassignment of migrant education program staff.

(4) Active involvement in the planning and negotiation of program applications and service agreements required under Section 54444.1.

(5) All other responsibilities required under state and federal laws or regulations.

(b) The responsibilities of the school districts or other agencies operating programs for migrant pupils include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Providing services in compliance with applicable state and federal laws or regulations.

(2) Providing information to parents.

(3) Providing support to instructional staff.

(c) The responsibilities of the region include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Providing funding to operating agencies within its jurisdiction in accordance with service agreements.

(2) Providing technical assistance to operating agencies operating under service agreements.

(3) Providing interagency coordination to improve the services available to participating pupils.

(4) Providing training for the parents and members of district, regional, and school parent advisory councils.

(5) Providing or arranging for staff development services for migrant education staff at the school and district levels.

(6) Providing direct services required pursuant to a service agreement entered into by the region.

(d) The responsibilities of the State Board of Education and the department shall be as set forth in the State Master Plan for Migrant Education developed under Section 54442.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 942, Sec. 10.   Operative July 1, 1982, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

54444.5.

The reorganization of service regions established pursuant to Section 54444.1 shall not affect the right to retain salary, leaves, and other benefits of persons employed in positions that do not require certification as follows:

(a) An employee of a service region that is included in any other service region shall become the employee of the new service region if the new service region has an equivalent vacant position that the new service region elects to fill in its program for migratory children.

(b) When a portion of the service region of a regional service center becomes part of another regional service center, an employee regularly assigned to perform duties in the service region affected shall become the employee of the acquiring regional service center if the acquiring regional service center has an equivalent vacant position that the acquiring regional service center elects to fill in its program for migratory children. An employee whose assignment pertained to the affected service region, but whose employment site was not in the service region, may elect to remain with the original regional service center or become the employee of the acquiring regional service center if the acquiring regional service center has an equivalent vacant position that the acquiring regional service center elects to fill in its program for migratory children.

(c) When the service region of any regional service center is divided between, or among, two or more regional service centers and the original regional service center ceases to exist, an employee of the original regional service center regularly assigned to perform duties in any specific service region shall become the employee of the regional service center acquiring the service region if the acquiring regional service center has an equivalent vacant position that the acquiring regional service center elects to fill in its program for migratory children. An employee not assigned to a specific service region within the original regional service center shall become the employee of any acquiring regional service center at the election of the employee if the acquiring regional service center has an equivalent vacant position that the acquiring regional service center elects to fill in its program for migratory children.

(d) If, pursuant to this section, an employee of a service region is unable to become an employee of a new or acquiring service region because there are no equivalent vacant positions available in the new or acquiring service region, that employee shall be placed on an eligibility list for an equivalent position for the migrant education program in the new or acquiring service region for a period of not less than 39 months.

(e) A service region that employs individuals pursuant to this section shall do so on a seniority basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

54445.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Newcomer Pupils [54450. - 54451.]

54450.

(a) For purposes of this section, “newcomer pupil” has the same meaning as “immigrant children and youth,” as defined in Section 7011(5) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(b) The department shall conduct all of the following activities in support of the education of newcomer pupils:

(1) Curate and maintain on its internet website information regarding requirements and best practices for newcomer pupils
 under current law, and available state and federally funded programs and resources that are supportive of these pupils’ success in school. This information shall include, but not be limited, to all of the following:

(A) The requirements of Sections 51225.1, 51225.2, and 60811.8 for newcomer pupils.

(B) The requirement to provide English language development instruction for those newcomer pupils classified as English learners, and best practices for English language development instruction for newcomer pupils.

(C) Local discretion in grade
 placement of newcomer pupils.

(D) Local discretion to enroll pupils for more than four years of high school instruction.

(E) Information about how the use of coursework completed in languages other than English in other countries may fulfill the world language course requirement for graduation pursuant to Section 51225.3 and the admissions requirements of the University
 of California and the California State University.

(F) Resources for the evaluation of foreign transcripts.

(G) Resources for support of newcomer pupils with disabilities.

(H) Information about the California Newcomer Education and Well-Being Program (CalNEW) program authorized by Section 13265 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(I) Information about programs authorized under the California Community Schools Partnership Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1).

(2) Publicly report on an annual basis on its internet website on the enrollment of
 newcomer pupils, using data currently collected pursuant to federal law, including statewide and local educational agency and charter school enrollment, disaggregated by country of origin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 342, Sec. 4.   (AB 714)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

54451.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the State Department of Education, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, for the California’s New Americans in Schools (CalNAS) program, which is hereby established, to provide services for newcomer pupils, English learners, and immigrant families. This funding shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2032.

(b) Funds allocated under this section shall be used to plan, design, and implement academic and social support services for the purpose of improving newcomer pupils’ educational
 outcomes and well-being. Allowable uses for funds allocated under this section include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Professional development and resources for staff designed to effectively support newcomer pupils and immigrant families.

(2) Academic supports, including, but not limited to, specialized academic and English language development instruction and programming and college and career counseling, including on the exercise of newcomer pupil rights under Sections 51225.1 and 51225.2.

(3) Social support services, including, but not limited to, family engagement, connection to community resources, extracurricular programs, transportation, and pupil leadership.

(4) Contracting with immigration legal services providers to support outreach or immigration-related legal and other support services to pupils and families pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 Division 9 of the Welfare Institutions Code.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Education shall award grants on a competitive basis to local educational agencies for purposes of this section. The department, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, may further refine the allocation formula of the grants to ensure the funds are allocated to the intended targeted population. Award amounts shall be prioritized based on the
 following factors:

(1) The percentage of newcomer pupils in a local educational agency for the previous five years, using data on newcomer pupils currently collected pursuant to federal law.

(2) The percentage of pupils, defined as socioeconomically disadvantaged in Section 42238.024, that the local educational agency serves, with local educational agencies serving the highest percentage of socioeconomically disadvantaged pupils being prioritized first.

(d) Of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a), ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available to the State Department of Education to competitively award a grant to a local educational agency, or a consortium of local educational agencies, to serve as a statewide technical assistance center and provide technical assistance for the CalNAS program, including all of the following:

(1) Providing technical assistance to establish
 newcomer pupil support programs for grantees, including resources for planning and implementation, such as program models, best practices, and resources for implementing academic, social, and legal supports.

(2) Professional development opportunities for school employees in addressing the needs of newcomer pupil and immigrant family populations, including antibias education and training, specialized academic and English language development instruction, social supports, and other supports as needed.

(3) Statewide and regional convenings and resource sharing opportunities for grantees to share successful strategies in serving newcomer
 pupils and immigrant families.

(e) The